North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 2. Creation. [Repealed]

§§ 53-2 through 53-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-2; 1921, c. 4, s. 2; C.S., s. 217(a); 1927, c. 47, s. 2; 1929, c. 72, s. 1; 1947, c. 781; 1953, c. 1209, s. 3; 1963, c. 793, s. 2; 1967, c. 789, s. 1; 1985, c. 677, s. 4; 1989, c. 187, s. 2; c. 770, s. 42; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 44; 2001-263, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-3: C.S., s. 217(b); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-4; 1921, c. 4, s. 4; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 56, s. 1; C.S., s. 217(c); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1953, c. 1209, s. 1; 1963, c. 793, s. 1; 1967, c. 789, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-5; 1921, c. 4, s. 5; C.S., s. 217(d); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1967, c. 823, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-6; 1921, c. 4, s. 6; C.S., s. 217(e); 1927, c. 47, s. 3; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1989, c. 20; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-7; 1921, c. 4, s. 7; C.S., s. 217(f); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1989, c. 187, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-8; 1921, c. 4, s. 8; C.S., s. 217(g); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-9; 1921, c. 4, s. 9; C.S., s. 217(h); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-9.1; 1989, c. 187, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-10; 1921, c. 4, s. 10; C.S., s. 217(i); 1965, c. 1032; 1967, c. 789, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-11; 1921, c. 4, s. 11; C.S., s. 217(j); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-12; 1921, c. 4, s. 12; C.S., s. 217(k); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1967, c. 789, s. 4; 1981, c. 671, s. 1; 1995, c. 479, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-13; 1921, c. 4, s. 13; C.S., s. 217(l); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1981, c. 671, s. 2; 1995, c. 479, s. 2, repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-14; 1921, c. 4, s. 14; C.S., s. 217(m); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1947, c. 696.

§§ 53-16 through 53-17.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-16; 1929, c. 148, s. 1; 1951, c. 1129, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-17; 1931, c. 207; 1941, c. 80; 1995, c. 479, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-17.1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 948, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-17.2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 845, s. 1; 1995, c. 142, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.